dictsource/id_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Indonesian

.group a
        a        a
     a) a        _|a
    A_) a        _|a
    au) a        _|a
        ai       aI
        au       aU

.group b
        b        b
     _) be (@@   b@
        be (n    b@


.group c
        c        tS
        ch       X

.group d
        d        d
        dj       dZ     / Dutch

.group e
        e        E
     e) e        _|E
    A_) e        _|E
        e (_     E

.group f
        f        f
        ff       f

.group g
        g        g

.group h
        h        h

.group i
        i        i
        ie       i
     i) i        _|i
    A_) i        _|i

.group j
        j        dZ

.group k
        k        k
        k (_     k
        kh       x
     _) ke (@@   k@
        ke (n    k@


.group l
        l        l
        ll       l

.group m
        m        m

     _) me (@@   m@
     _) mempe (@    m@mp@

.group n
        n        n
        ng       N
        ny       n^

.group o
        o        o
     o) o        _|o
    A_) o        _|o
        o (r     O
        oe       u        // Dutch spelling

.group p
        p        p
        pp       p
        ph       f

     _) pe (@@   p@


.group q
        q        k
        qu       kw

.group r
        r        R2
        r (K     R
     e) r (K     R


.group s
        s        s
        ss       s
        sy       C   // perhaps [S;] ??
        sj       C

     _) se (@@   s@
@) s (_S1 s

.group t
        t        t
        tj       tS      // Dutch
     _) tel      t@l
     _) ter (@@  t@R



.group u
        u        u
     u) u        _|u
    A_) u        _|u

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        ks
     _) x        z

.group y
        y        j

.group z
        z        z

.group
        $        dOlaR


    __) - (_D    t,andak'uR2aN

        *        b'intaN
     *) * (*
        ** 
    **) * (_         _::
